Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 1. Comprehensive Plan, Vessels, and Facilities.

Sec. 19.65.010.
Duty station or port change for employees of the Alaska marine highway system. [Repealed, § 52 ch 59 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 19.65.011.
Short-term and comprehensive long-range plans.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, in consultation with the Alaska Marine Highway Operations Board, shall prepare a short-term plan and a comprehensive long-range plan for the development and improvement of the Alaska marine highway system and shall, in consultation with the Alaska Marine Highway Operations Board, revise and update the short-term plan annually and the comprehensive long-range plan at least every five years. The short-term plan must describe the means by which effective and efficient progress toward priorities and goals defined in the comprehensive long-range plan will be attained, must include recommendations for the state operating and capital budgets, and must include a description of skill or competency gaps in the membership of the Alaska Marine Highway Operations Board. The comprehensive long-range plan must include priorities and goals for the Alaska marine highway system and a proposed strategic maintenance and vessel replacement plan and may recommend performance measures, including output, efficiency, and effectiveness measures. The department shall submit both the short-term and the comprehensive long-range plans and revisions and updates of the plans to the legislature and the governor and make the plans available to the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 20 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective October 11, 2021, rewrote the section, which read, “The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, in consultation with the Alaska Marine Transportation Advisory Board, shall prepare a comprehensive long-range plan for the development and improvement of the Alaska marine highway system and shall, in consultation with the Alaska Marine Transportation Advisory Board, revise and update the plan at least every five years. The department shall submit the comprehensive long-range plan and revisions and updates of the plan to the legislature.”

Sec. 19.65.020.
Naming of vessel or facility.

A vessel or facility of the Alaska marine highway system constructed or acquired by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under this chapter may be given a name only by law.

A maritime vessel shall bear the name of an Alaska glacier.

A vessel used principally on the inland waterways of the state shall bear the name of a historical vessel which used the rivers of the state.

The new maritime vessel to be delivered to the Alaska marine highway system in 1998 is named the Motor Vessel Kennicott.

The Motor Vessel Fairweather and the Motor Vessel Chenega are authorized names for state ferries first operating as part of the Alaska marine highway system on or after August 8, 2002. The commissioner of transportation and public facilities shall select between the names for the one most appropriate to the route served by the ferry and shall publicly announce the selection.

The Motor Vessel Lituya is the authorized name for the state ferry first operating as part of the Alaska marine highway system to serve between Metlakatla and Ketchikan on or after August 9, 2003.

The Motor Vessel Tazlina and the Motor Vessel Hubbard are authorized names for the state ferries first entering Alaska marine highway system service on or after 2017.

History.

(§ 2 ch 4 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 154 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, “this chapter” was substituted for “AS 19.60 — AS 19.65” to reflect the 1996 renumbering of AS 19.60.

Subsection (d) was enacted in 1997 as uncodified law in § 1, ch. 1, SLA 1997 and codified in 2002.
Subsection (e) was enacted as AS

35.40.150

and renumbered in 2002.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective August 11, 2017, added (g).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 23, SLA 2017 (SB 33), which added subsection (g), see 2017 Senate Journal 70 — 71.

Sec. 19.65.025.
Vessel design and construction. [Repealed, § 43 ch 128 SLA 1994.]

Sec. 19.65.030.
Acquisition and maintenance of ferry terminal facilities.

The department shall construct, purchase, or lease ferry terminal facilities at locations it selects for the loading and unloading of passengers, and vehicles under their own power, on and off ferries. The department shall repair and maintain these facilities. Construction and purchasing under this subsection are governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

The department may connect ferry terminal facilities with local highway systems.

The department may adopt regulations governing the use of ferry terminal facilities by the public that it considers necessary and proper in the public interest. The department may charge a fee for the use of ferry terminal facilities, whether the use is under a permit or otherwise, and whether it is by one or more individuals.

A person may construct a ferry terminal facility upon obtaining the approval of the department as to its location. A ferry terminal facility constructed by a person other than the department is subject to reasonable regulations governing its use that the department considers necessary and proper in the public interest.

A ferry terminal facility may not be constructed without the approval of the department.

A ferry terminal facility in existence and serving the public on January 1, 1959, is not affected by this section.

In this section

“department” means the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities;

“ferry” means a vessel used in the common carriage of passengers and self-propelled vehicles in intrastate commerce.

History.

(§§ 2, 3 ch 189 SLA 1959; am § 19 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 37 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (a)-(g) were formerly AS

19.60.010

— 19.60.070, respectively. Renumbered in 1996, at which time “subsection” was substituted for “section” in subsection (a) and “section” was substituted for “chapter” in subsections (f) and (g).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Alaska may assert criminal jurisdiction over all persons traveling on state ferries within the territorial sea. Congress made an express grant of power to the state for marine jurisdiction. Thus, while Alaska’s jurisdiction over the territorial sea is not exclusive, but is concurrent with that of the United States, state enforcement officers may exercise their authority as long as the vessel is within the territorial sea, see 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 5.

Sec. 19.65.035.
Transportation of members of the Alaska organized militia.

To the extent that space is available, the commissioner of transportation and public facilities shall provide free transportation on vessels of the Alaska marine highway system for a member of the Alaska National Guard, the Alaska Naval Militia, or the Alaska State Defense Force who is en route to or from drill, training, or other official militia activities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 25 SLA 2000)